Washington statutes.
RCW 11.118.050

Enforcement of trust provisions.

The intended use of the principal or income can be enforced by a person designated for that purpose in the trust instrument, by the person having custody of an animal that is a beneficiary of the trust, or by a person appointed by a court upon application to it by any person. Such person is considered to be a permissible distributee, as defined in RCW 11.98.002, of the trust. A person with an interest in the welfare of the animal may petition for an order appointing or removing a person designated or appointed to enforce the trust.

[ 2013 c 272 s 27; 2001 c 327 s 6.]

NOTES:

Application—2013 c 272: See note following RCW 11.98.002.